Hawaii statutes.
[§586-7] Assistance of police in service or
execution. When an order is issued under this chapter upon request of the
petitioner, the court may order the police department to serve the order and
related documents upon respondent and to accompany the petitioner and assist in
placing the petitioner in possession of the dwelling or residence. [L 1982, c
123, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next